tests/softsign.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../kaz.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kaz.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "Russian words ending in ь":
    автомобиль<n><nom> : автомобиль
    автомобиль<n><pl><nom> : автомобильдер
    автомобиль<n><gen> : автомобильдің

  "Russian words ending in сс":
    процесс<n><nom> : процесс
    процесс<n><pl><nom> : процестер
    процесс<n><gen> : процестің
